tests/syntax/legacy.sbl
// Test legacy commands.
externals (stem)
strings (ch)
stringescapes {}
stringdef o" decimal '246'
stringdef o^ hex 'f4'
define stem as (
  among (
    (next)
    'a' 'e' 'i' 'o' 'u' (
      [next]
      => ch
      delete
      <+ ch
    )
  )
)
